Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-606
Construction; location.

No person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association shall construct any vault, crypt, columbarium, or mausoleum for public use, wholly or partially above the surface of the ground, to be used to contain the body of any dead person unless the same is located within the confines of an established cemetery, which cemetery has been in existence and operation for a period of at least five years immediately preceding the time of erection thereof.

Laws 1957, c. 18, § 1, p. 145;

Laws 1969, c. 55, § 1, p. 355;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 121.